Hawaii statutes.
[§393-4] Place of performance.
"Employment" includes an individual's entire service, performed
within or both within and without this State if:

(1) The service is localized in this State; or

(2) The service is not localized in any state but
some of the service is performed in this State and[:]

(A) The individual's base of operation, or, if
there is no base of operation, the place from which such service is directed or
controlled, is in the State; or

(B) The individual's base of operation or
place from which the service is directed or controlled is not in any state in
which some part of the service is performed but the individual's residence is
in this State. [L 1974, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next